Illinois, session 104th, HB4989.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Data 5Center Heating and Cooling Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Air to water heat exchanger" means a mechanism that 8recaptures any heat produced into water loops, which can then 9be redirected to local heating systems.10    "Data center" has the meaning given to that term in 11subsection (c) of Section 605-1025 of the Department of 12Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil 13Administrative Code of Illinois.  14    Section 10. Data center heating and cooling mechanisms.15    (a) Any new or existing data center in this State shall 16adopt a heat energy reuse plan that involves the use of an air 17to water heat exchanger to help heat homes and businesses in 18the area around the data center.19    (b) Any data center constructed on or after the effective 20date of this Act that has an aggregate demand load of 20 21megawatts or more shall have a liquid cooling system, such as 22direct-to-chip cooling or immersion cooling, incorporated into   HB4989- 2 -LRB104 17645 AAS 31076 b1the data center. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on 3January 1, 2027.